Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2408
Agency; reports; required.

Each agency shall report monthly to the Director of Administrative Services and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst any account that has not been paid within the applicable time period prescribed by section 81-2403. Each agency shall report annually any interest charge on a past-due account, whether paid or unpaid, to the Governor and to the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature.

Laws 1988, LB 1079, § 8.